Utah statutes.
41-1a-1005.3.   Resale of salvage vehicles.

(1)  A motor vehicle may not be offered, auctioned, sold, leased, transferred, or exchanged by an owner, that is not a manufacturer, dealer, motor vehicle auction, or consignor to a motor vehicle auction with the knowledge that it is a salvage vehicle without prior written disclosure being given to any prospective purchaser.

(2)  For a disclosure required by Subsection (1), the following disclosure language shall be contained in each contract for sale or lease of a salvage vehicle to a purchaser or shall be contained in a form affixed to a contract, lease, bill of sale, or any other document that transfers title:

"THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT MUST BE GIVEN BY THE SELLER TO THE BUYER EVERY TIME THIS VEHICLE IS RESOLD WITH A SALVAGE CERTIFICATE

DISCLOSURE STATEMENT

Vehicle Identification Number (VIN)

Year:		Make:		 Model:

SALVAGE VEHICLE--NOT FOR RESALE WITHOUT DISCLOSURE

WARNING: THIS SALVAGE VEHICLE MAY NOT BE SAFE FOR OPERATION UNLESS PROPERLY REPAIRED.  SOME STATES MAY REQUIRE AN INSPECTION BEFORE THIS VEHICLE MAY BE REGISTERED.  THE STATE OF UTAH MAY REQUIRE THIS VEHICLE TO BE PERMANENTLY BRANDED AS A REBUILT SALVAGE VEHICLE.  OTHER STATES MAY ALSO PERMANENTLY BRAND THE CERTIFICATE OF TITLE.

_________________________________________________________________

Signature of Purchaser							Date"



Enacted by Chapter 390, 2012 General Session

